Mississippi, session 2026, HB1547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Healing Outreach, Prevention and Education (H.O.P.E.) Act." (2)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Human trafficking is a pervasive issue affecting individuals across Mississippi, necessitating a comprehensive and informed response; (b)  Nurses are often in a unique position to identify and assist victims of human trafficking; (c)  Implementing trauma-informed training will enhance the ability of nurses to recognize and respond to signs of human trafficking; and (d)  Establishing clear reporting mechanisms will facilitate timely intervention and support for victims. (2)  Every nurse under the purview of the Mississippi Board of Nursing who applies for a nursing license or applies to renew his or her license must certify to the board that he or she has completed one (1) hour of human trafficking training that includes a trauma-informed curriculum designed to educate nurses on identifying, responding to and reporting human trafficking. (3) (a)  Licensed nurses requiring training under this section shall report any suspected case of human trafficking involving a minor to the Department of Child Protection Services, in accordance with Sections 43-21-353 and 97-5-51. (b)  Licensed nurses requiring training under this section shall report any suspected case of human trafficking involving an adult to appropriate law enforcement authorities when a victim is in imminent danger, after confirming a victim's consent, or any other circumstance when disclosure to law enforcement authorities is required by law. (c)  In addition to the mandated reports in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, licensed nurses requiring training under this section shall submit reports of suspected human trafficking to the state and national hotlines, ensuring timely communication with relevant authorities and service providers. (d)  Reports required under this section shall be made as soon as practicable, but no later than twenty-four (24) hours after forming a reasonable suspicion of human trafficking. (4)  Failure to meet the requirements of this section shall be a violation of the Mississippi Nursing Practice Law, Section 73-15-1 et seq., subject to disciplinary action as determined by the Board of Nursing in accordance with its governing laws, policies, and procedures. (5)  The requirements under this section shall take effect January 1, 2027. SECTION 2.  Section 73-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-19.  (1)  Registered nurse applicant qualifications.  Any applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  Written official evidence of completion of a nursing program approved by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to this board; (c)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (d)  Certification that he or she has completed the training required under Section 1 of this act; and ( * * *de)  Any other official records required by the board. In addition to the requirements specified in paragraphs (a) through ( * * *de) of this subsection, in order to qualify for a license to practice as a registered nurse, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-15-29 or guilty of any offense specified in Section 73-15-33.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of his or her fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. The board may, in its discretion, refuse to accept the application of any person who has been convicted of a criminal offense under any provision of Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, or any provision of this article. (2)  Licensure by examination.  (a)  Upon the board being satisfied that an applicant for a license as a registered nurse has met the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall proceed to examine such applicant in such subjects as the board shall, in its discretion, determine. The subjects in which applicants shall be examined shall be in conformity with curricula in schools of nursing approved by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to the board. (b)  The applicant shall be required to pass the written examination as selected by the board. (c)  Upon successful completion of such examination, the board shall issue to the applicant a license to practice as a registered nurse. (d)  The board may use any part or all of the state board test pool examination for registered nurse licensure, its successor examination, or any other nationally standardized examination identified by the board in its rules.  The passing score shall be established by the board in its rules. (3)  Licensure by endorsement.  The board may issue a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse without examination to an applicant who has been duly licensed as a registered nurse under the laws of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country if, in the opinion of the board, the applicant meets the qualifications required of licensed registered nurses in this state and has previously achieved the passing score or scores on the licensing examination required by this state, at the time of his or her graduation.  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (4)  Requirements for rewriting the examination.  The board shall establish in its rules the requirements for rewriting the examination for those persons failing the examination on the first writing or subsequent rewriting. (5)  Fee.  The applicant applying for a license by examination or by endorsement to practice as a registered nurse shall pay a fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) to the board. (6)  Temporary permit. (a)  The board may issue a temporary permit to practice nursing to a graduate of an approved school of nursing pending the results of the examination in Mississippi, and to a qualified applicant from another state, territory or possession of the United States, or District of Columbia, or pending licensure procedures as provided for elsewhere in this article.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (b)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of ninety (90) days to a registered nurse who is currently licensed in another state, territory or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia and who is an applicant for licensure by endorsement.  Such permit is not renewable except by board action.  The issuance of a temporary permit to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (c)  The board may issue a temporary permit to a graduate of an approved school of nursing pending the results of the first licensing examination scheduled after application. Such permit is not renewable except by board action. (d)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of thirty (30) days to any registered nurse during the time enrolled in a nursing reorientation program.  This time period may be extended by board action.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (e)  The board may adopt such regulations as are necessary to limit the practice of persons to whom temporary permits are issued. (7)  Temporary license. The board may issue a temporary license to practice nursing at a youth camp licensed by the State Board of Health to nonresident registered nurses and retired resident registered nurses under the provisions of Section 75-74-8. (8)  Title and abbreviation.  Any person who holds a license or holds the privilege to practice as a registered nurse in this state shall have the right to use the title "registered nurse" and the abbreviation "R.N."  No other person shall assume such title or use such abbreviation, or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that the person using the same is a registered nurse. (9)  Registered nurses licensed under a previous law.  Any person holding a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse issued by this board which is valid on July 1, 1981, shall thereafter be deemed to be licensed as a registered nurse under the provisions of this article upon payment of the fee provided in Section 73-15-27. (10)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 3.  Section 73-15-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-21.  (1)  Licensed practical nurse applicant qualifications.  Any applicant for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  A diploma from an approved high school or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the appropriate educational agency; (c)  Written official evidence of completion of a practical nursing program approved by the State Department of Education through its Division of Vocational Education, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to this board; (d)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (e)  Certification that he or she has completed the training required under Section 1 of this act; and ( * * *ef)  Any other official records required by the board. (2)  Licensed practical nurse applicant qualifications for military medics.  Any applicant for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse who is a United States Army Combat Medic Specialist, a United States Navy Hospital Corpsman, or a United States Air Force Aerospace Medical Service Specialist shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  A diploma from an approved high school or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the appropriate educational agency; (c)  Written official evidence of completion of the training required for a United States Army Combat Medic Specialist, a United States Navy Hospital Corpsman, or a United States Air Force Aerospace Medical Service Specialist, and after such training, completion of two (2) years of clinical experience that involves providing direct patient care, which may include trauma or emergency oriented care; (d)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (e)  Certification that he or she has completed the training required under Section 1 of this act; and ( * * *ef)  Any other official records required by the board. (3)  Additional requirements for applicants.  In addition to the requirements specified in paragraphs (a) through ( * * *ef) of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, in order to qualify for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-15-29 or guilty of any offense specified in Section 73-15-33.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of his or her fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. The board may, in its discretion, refuse to accept the application of any person who has been convicted of a criminal offense under any provision of Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, or any provision of this article. (4)  Licensure by examination.  (a)  Upon the board being satisfied that an applicant for a license as a practical nurse has met the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section and subsection (3) of this section, the board shall proceed to examine such applicant in such subjects as the board shall, in its discretion, determine.  The subjects in which applicants shall be examined shall be in conformity with curricula in schools of practical nursing approved by the State Department of Education. (b)  The applicant shall be required to pass the written examination selected by the board. (c)  Upon successful completion of such examination, the board shall issue to the applicant a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse. (d)  The board may use any part or all of the state board test pool examination for practical nurse licensure, its successor examination, or any other nationally standardized examination identified by the board in its rules.  The passing score shall be established by the board in its rules. (5)  Licensure by endorsement.  The board may issue a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse without examination to an applicant who has been duly licensed as a licensed practical nurse under the laws of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country if, in the opinion of the board, the applicant meets the qualifications required of licensed practical nurses in this state and has previously achieved the passing score or scores on the licensing examination required by this state at the time of his or her graduation.  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (6)  Licensure by equivalent amount of theory and clinical experience.  In the discretion of the board, former students of a state-accredited school preparing students to become registered nurses may be granted permission to take the examination for licensure to practice as a licensed practical nurse, provided the applicant's record or transcript indicates the former student completed an equivalent amount of theory and clinical experiences as required of a graduate of a practical nursing program, and provided the school attended was, at the time of the student's attendance, an accredited school of nursing. (7)  Requirements for rewriting the examination.  The board shall establish in its rules the requirements for rewriting the examination for those persons failing the examination on the first writing or subsequent writing. (8)  Fee.  The applicant applying for a license by examination or by endorsement to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall pay a fee not to exceed Sixty Dollars ($60.00) to the board. (9)  Temporary permit.  (a) The board may issue a temporary permit to practice practical nursing to a graduate of an approved school of practical nursing pending the results of the examination in Mississippi, and to a qualified applicant from another state, territory or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, pending licensing procedures as provided for elsewhere in this article.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (b)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of ninety (90) days to a licensed practical nurse who is currently licensed in another state, territory or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia and who is an applicant for licensure by endorsement.  Such permit is not renewable except by board action.  The issuance of a temporary permit to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (c)  The board may issue a temporary permit to a graduate of an approved practical nursing education program or an equivalent program satisfactory to the board pending the results of the first licensing examination scheduled after application. Such permit is not renewable except by board action. (d)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of thirty (30) days to any licensed practical nurse during the time enrolled in a nursing reorientation program. This time period may be extended by board action.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (e)  The board may adopt such regulations as are necessary to limit the practice of persons to whom temporary permits are issued. (10)  Title and abbreviation.  Any person who holds a license or holds the privilege to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state shall have the right to use the title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation "L.P.N."  No other person shall assume such title or use such abbreviation, or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that a person using the same is a licensed practical nurse. (11)  Licensed practical nurses licensed under a previous law.  Any person holding a license to practice nursing as a practical nurse issued by this board which is valid on July 1, 1981, shall thereafter be deemed to be licensed as a practical nurse under the provisions of this article upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 73-15-27. (12)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 4.  Section 73-15-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-29.  (1)  The board shall have power to revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any license issued by the board, or to revoke or suspend any privilege to practice, or to deny an application for a license, or to fine, place on probation and/or discipline a licensee, in any manner specified in this article, upon proof that such person: (a)  Has committed fraud or deceit in securing or attempting to secure such license; (b)  Has been convicted of a felony, or a crime involving moral turpitude or has had accepted by a court a plea of nolo contendere to a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude (a certified copy of the judgment of the court of competent jurisdiction of such conviction or pleas shall be prima facie evidence of such conviction); (c)  Has negligently or willfully acted in a manner inconsistent with the health or safety of the persons under the licensee's care; (d)  Has had a license or privilege to practice as a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction, has voluntarily surrendered such license or privilege to practice in any jurisdiction, has been placed on probation as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in any jurisdiction or has been placed under a disciplinary order(s) in any manner as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in any jurisdiction, (a certified copy of the order of suspension, revocation, probation or disciplinary action shall be prima facie evidence of such action); (e)  Has negligently or willfully practiced nursing in a manner that fails to meet generally accepted standards of such nursing practice; (f)  Has negligently or willfully violated any order, rule or regulation of the board pertaining to nursing practice or licensure; (g)  Has falsified or in a repeatedly negligent manner made incorrect entries or failed to make essential entries on records; (h)  Is addicted to or dependent on alcohol or other habit-forming drugs or is a habitual user of narcotics, barbiturates, amphetamines, hallucinogens, or other drugs having similar effect, or has misappropriated any medication; (i)  Has a physical, mental or emotional condition that renders the licensee unable to perform nursing services or duties with reasonable skill and safety; (j)  Has engaged in any other conduct, whether of the same or of a different character from that specified in this article, that would constitute a crime as defined in Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, and that relates to such person's employment as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse; (k)  Engages in conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public; (l)  Engages in any unprofessional conduct as identified by the board in its rules; (m)  Has violated any provision of this article; (n)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners; * * *or (o)  Violation(s) of any provision of Title 41, Chapter 141, Mississippi Code of 1972 * * *.; or (p)  Failure to meet the requirements of Section 1 of this act. (2)  When the board finds any person unqualified because of any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section, it may enter an order imposing one or more of the following penalties: (a)  Denying application for a license or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (b)  Administering a reprimand; (c)  Suspending or restricting the license or other authorization to practice as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse for up to two (2) years without review; (d)  Revoking the license or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (e)  Requiring the disciplinee to submit to care, counseling or treatment by persons and/or agencies approved or designated by the board as a condition for initial, continued or renewed licensure or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (f)  Requiring the disciplinee to participate in a program of education prescribed by the board as a condition for initial, continued or renewed licensure or other authorization to practice; (g)  Requiring the disciplinee to practice under the supervision of a registered nurse for a specified period of time; or (h)  Imposing a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (3)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license or privilege to practice of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license or privilege to practice for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (4)  If the public health, safety or welfare imperatively requires emergency action and the board incorporates a finding to that effect in an order, the board may order summary suspension of a license pending proceedings for revocation or other action. These proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined by the board. (5)  The board may establish by rule an alternative to discipline program for licensees who have an impairment as a result of substance abuse or a mental health condition, which program shall include at least the following components: (a)  Participation in the program is voluntary with the licensee, and the licensee must enter the program before the board holds a disciplinary action hearing regarding the licensee; (b)  The full cost of participation in the program, including the cost of any care, counseling, treatment and/or education received by the licensee, shall be borne by the licensee; (c)  All of the procedures and records regarding the licensee's participation in the program shall be confidential, shall not be disclosed and shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983; and (d)  A licensee may not participate in the program more often than one (1) time during any period of five (5) years or such longer period as set by the board. (6)  A nurse practitioner who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. SECTION 5.  Section 45-33-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-23.  For the purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Conviction" means that, regarding the person's offense, there has been a determination or judgment of guilt as a result of a trial or the entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere regardless of whether adjudication is withheld.  "Conviction of similar offenses" includes, but is not limited to, a conviction by a federal or military tribunal, including a court-martial conducted by the Armed Forces of the United States, a conviction for an offense committed on an Indian Reservation or other federal property, a conviction in any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Marianna Islands or the United States Virgin Islands, and a conviction in a foreign country if the foreign country's judicial system is such that it satisfies minimum due process set forth in the guidelines under Section 111(5)(B) Public Law 109-248. (b) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Public Safety unless otherwise specified. (c)  "Jurisdiction" means any court or locality including any state court, federal court, military court, Indian tribunal or foreign court, the fifty (50) states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Marianna Islands or the United States Virgin Islands, and Indian tribes that elect to function as registration jurisdictions under Title 1, SORNA Section 127 of the Adam Walsh Child Safety Act. (d)  "Permanent residence" means a place where the person abides, lodges, or resides for a period of fourteen (14) or more aggregate days in a six (6) month period. (e) "Registration" means providing information to the appropriate agency within the timeframe specified as required by this chapter. (f)  "Registration duties" means obtaining the registration information required on the form specified by the department as well as the photograph, fingerprints and biological sample of the registrant.  Biological samples are to be forwarded to the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory pursuant to Section 45-33-37; the photograph, fingerprints and other registration information are to be forwarded to the Department of Public Safety immediately. (g)  "Responsible agency" is defined as the person or government entity whose duty it is to obtain information from a criminal sex offender upon conviction and to transmit that information to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety. (i)  For a criminal sex offender being released from the custody of the Department of Corrections, the responsible agency is the Department of Corrections. (ii)  For a criminal sex offender being released from a county jail, the responsible agency is the sheriff of that county. (iii)  For a criminal sex offender being released from a municipal jail, the responsible agency is the police department of that municipality. (iv)  For a sex offender in the custody of the youth court, the responsible agency is the youth court. (v)  For a criminal sex offender who is being placed on probation, including conditional discharge or unconditional discharge, without any sentence of incarceration, the responsible agency is the sentencing court. (vi)  For an offender who has been committed to a mental institution following an acquittal by reason of insanity, the responsible agency is the facility from which the offender is released.  Specifically, the director of the facility shall notify the Department of Public Safety before the offender's release. (vii)  For a criminal sex offender who is being released from a jurisdiction outside this state or who has a prior conviction in another jurisdiction and who is to reside, work or attend school in this state, the responsible agency is both the sheriff of the proposed county of residence and the department. (h)  "Sex offense" or "registrable offense" means any of the following offenses: (i)  Section 97-3-53 relating to kidnapping, if the victim was below the age of eighteen (18); (ii)  Section 97-3-65 relating to rape; however, conviction or adjudication under Section 97-3-65(1)(a) when the offender was eighteen (18) years of age or younger at the time of the alleged offense, shall not be a registrable sex offense; (iii)  Section 97-3-71 relating to rape and assault with intent to ravish; (iv)  Section 97-3-95 relating to sexual battery; however, conviction or adjudication under Section 97-3-95(1)(c) when the offender was eighteen (18) years of age or younger at the time of the alleged offense, shall not be a registrable sex offense; (v)  Section 97-5-5 relating to enticing a child for concealment, prostitution or marriage; (vi)  Section 97-5-23 relating to the touching of a child, mentally defective or incapacitated person or physically helpless person for lustful purposes; (vii)  Section 97-5-27 relating to the dissemination of sexually oriented material to children; (viii)  Section 97-5-33 relating to the exploitation of children; (ix)  Section 97-5-41 relating to the carnal knowledge of a stepchild, adopted child or child of a cohabiting partner; (x)  Section 97-29-3 relating to sexual intercourse between teacher and student; (xi)  Section 97-29-59 relating to unnatural intercourse; (xii)  Section 43-47-18 relating to sexual abuse of a vulnerable person; (xiii)  Section 97-3-54.1(1)(c) relating to procuring sexual servitude of a minor and Section 97-3-54.3 relating to aiding, abetting or conspiring to violate Section 97-3-54.1(1)(c); (xiv)  Section 97-29-61(2) relating to voyeurism when the victim is a child under sixteen (16) years of age; (xv)  Section 97-29-63 relating to filming another without permission where there is an expectation of privacy; (xvi)  Section 97-29-45(1)(a) relating to obscene electronic communication; (xvii) Section 97-3-104 relating to the crime of sexual activity between law enforcement, correctional or custodial personnel and prisoners; (xviii) Section 97-5-39(1)(e) relating to contributing to the neglect or delinquency of a child, felonious abuse or battery of a child, if the victim was sexually abused; (xix)  Section 97-29-51 relating to procuring or promoting prostitution when the victim is a child under eighteen (18) years of age; (xx)  Section 97-1-7 relating to attempt to commit any of the offenses referenced in this paragraph (h); (xxi)  Section 97-3-54.1(1)(a) relating to human trafficking where commercial sexual activity, as defined in Section 97-3-54.4, is involved; (xxi)  Any other offense resulting in a conviction in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be deemed to be such a crime without regard to its designation elsewhere; (xxii)  Any offense resulting in a conviction in another jurisdiction for which registration is required in the jurisdiction where the conviction was had; (xxiii)  Any conviction of conspiracy to commit, accessory to commission, or attempt to commit any offense listed in this section; (xxiv)  Capital murder when one (1) of the above-described offenses is the underlying crime. (i)  "Temporary residence" is defined as any place where the person abides, lodges, or resides for a period of seven (7) or more aggregate days in a six (6) month period which is not the person's permanent residence. (j) "Address" means the actual physical street address of a person's permanent or temporary residence.  For a person who is homeless but is subject to registration under this chapter, the address information must provide a specific description of where the person habitually lives; the term "homeless" or similar description does not constitute an address within the contemplation of this chapter. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.